Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.550

Electric vehicle supply equipment—Publicly available.

(1) In addition to the definition of publicly available electric vehicle supply equipment provided in RCW 19.94.010 and except for the applicable exemptions in RCW 19.94.555, electric vehicle supply equipment is considered publicly available and is subject to the requirements of this chapter if:

(a) A lessee, electric vehicle service provider, or a property owner designates electric vehicle supply equipment to be available only to customers or visitors of a business or charging network;

(b) Any member of the public can obtain vehicular access to electric vehicle supply equipment and associated parking spaces for free or through payment of a fee, including electric vehicle supply equipment located in a parking garage or gated facility; or

(c) The electric vehicle supply equipment and associated parking spaces are made available to the public for only limited time periods, then the electric vehicle supply equipment and associated parking spaces are considered publicly available electric vehicle supply equipment during those limited time periods only.

(2) The director may by rule subject additional types of electric vehicle supply equipment to the requirements of this chapter to benefit the public and provide protections to consumers.

[ 2021 c 238 s 2.]